Hawaii, session 2025, SB1096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that license plate flipping devices are manual, electric, or mechanical devices that can be installed on motor vehicles in order to switch between two or more license plates or hide a license plate from view. The legislature further finds that these devices can be used to prevent law enforcement from identifying a vehicle. These devices create a significant nuisance for law enforcement officials and pose a threat to public safety. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit the use of license plate flipping devices. SECTION 2.  Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§286-    License plate flipping devices; prohibited.  (a) No person shall operate a motor vehicle with, possess, purchase, install, sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute a license plate flipping device. (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $2,000 for each separate violation. (c) For the purpose of this section "license plate flipping device" means a manual, electric, or mechanical device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle that: (1)  Switches between two or more license plates for the purpose of allowing a motor vehicle operator to change the license plate displayed on the operator's motor vehicle; or (2)  Hides a license plate from view by flipping the license plate so that the plate number is not visible." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.